Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 15 Administrative Procedures
25-15-207. Rules — Actions for declaratory judgments.

The validity or applicability of a rule may be determined in an action for declaratory judgment if it is alleged that the rule, or its threatened application, injures or threatens to injure the plaintiff in his or her person, business, or property.

The action may be brought in the circuit court of any county in which the plaintiff resides or does business or in Pulaski County Circuit Court.

The agency shall be made defendant in that action.

A declaratory judgment may be rendered whether or not the plaintiff has requested the agency to pass upon the validity or applicability of the rule in question.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Survey — Civil Procedure, 12 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 135.

Pursuant to subsection (a), an action for declaratory judgment is a proper method for testing the validity of rules which, in the plaintiff's view, threaten future damage. McEuen Burial Ass'n v. Arkansas Burial Ass'n Bd., 298 Ark. 572, 769 S.W.2d 415 (1989).

Beneficiaries of a state Medicaid program were not required to exhaust their administrative remedies before filing their declaratory judgment action in the circuit court because any irreparable harm to the beneficiaries warranted application of the futility exception; also, subsection (d) of this section provided the beneficiaries the statutory scheme for seeking a declaratory judgment in lieu of pursuing the exhaustion of remedies.Ark. Dep't of Human Servs. v. Ledgerwood, 2017 Ark. 308, 530 S.W.3d 336 (2017).

Declaratory actions are intended to supplement rather than replace ordinary causes of action. Regional Care Facilities, Inc. v. Rose Care, Inc., 322 Ark. 780, 912 S.W.2d 406 (1995).

Declaratory relief is not proper when the identical questions involved in the declaratory judgment proceeding are already at issue between the parties in a pending action and declaratory judgment procedure is not proper as a means of trying a case, or various issues involved in it, by piecemeal. Regional Care Facilities, Inc. v. Rose Care, Inc., 322 Ark. 780, 912 S.W.2d 406 (1995).

Where a church and its affiliated university sought an exception from certification requirements of the Arkansas Department of Higher Education, the church could have brought a declaratory action to determine whether or not the exception for programs that were predominantly religious in nature applied; thus, the church was not entitled to a writ of mandamus. Axley v. Hardin, 353 Ark. 529, 110 S.W.3d 766 (2003).

Motion to dismiss on sovereign-immunity grounds filed by the Arkansas Department of Human Services (DHS) and its director as to declaratory relief sought against DHS and the director in his official capacity was properly denied under this section, which waives sovereign immunity when a declaratory judgment is sought regarding the validity or applicability of an agency rule; this section allowed school districts to challenge a rule requiring licensed child-care centers to have general liability insurance.Ark. Dep't of Human Servs. v. Fort Smith Sch. Dist., 2015 Ark. 81, 455 S.W.3d 294 (2015).

Circuit court properly denied a motion to dismiss on sovereign-immunity grounds filed by the Arkansas Department of Human Services (DHS) and its director as to the injunctive relief sought against DHS and the director in his official capacity; where there is a permitted challenge to a rule under the declaratory-judgment statute, a request for injunctive relief is simply a means to enforce the judgment, should the circuit court determine that the rule is invalid or inapplicable.Ark. Dep't of Human Servs. v. Fort Smith Sch. Dist., 2015 Ark. 81, 455 S.W.3d 294 (2015).

Circuit court had no subject-matter jurisdiction to review the licensing decision of the Medical Marijuana Commission (MMC) concerning cultivation facilities because (1) under §25-15-212, no “adjudication” as defined by statute occurred at the agency level and the MMC's decision was not quasi-judicial, and (2) under this section, the court only had jurisdiction to resolve a rule's validity or applicability, but the invalidity of a MMC rule was not pled, the “applicability” of a rule was not contested, and no declaration of whether a rule should have been applied was sought; instead, the complaints sought a declaration that the “application” of the MMC rules was improper, unfair, and arbitrary.Ark. Dep't of Fin. & Admin. v. Naturalis Health, LLC, 2018 Ark. 224, 549 S.W.3d 901 (2018).

A broad reading of “applicability”, as to permit circuit courts to determine whether the agency complied with the rules, would largely eliminate the notice and hearing requirements of the Arkansas Adminstrative Procedure Act and would swallow §25-15-212 entirely.Ark. Dep't of Fin. & Admin. v. Naturalis Health, LLC, 2018 Ark. 224, 549 S.W.3d 901 (2018).

Supreme Court of Akansas did not address whether Rule 19 of the Medical Marijuana Commission conveyed subject-matter jurisdiction to the circuit court; although that rule provided that a denial of a cultivation license may be appealed to the circuit court, the issue was not ripe because the appellees had not been issued denial letters subsequent to an adjudication.Ark. Dep't of Fin. & Admin. v. Naturalis Health, LLC, 2018 Ark. 224, 549 S.W.3d 901 (2018).

It seems to be now a recognized doctrine that requires administrative relief to be sought before resorting to declaratory procedure, wherever administrative relief is afforded and this requirement is not one merely requiring the initiation of administrative procedure, but the administrative procedure must be pursued to its final conclusion before resort may be had to the court for declaratory relief. Regional Care Facilities, Inc. v. Rose Care, Inc., 322 Ark. 780, 912 S.W.2d 406 (1995).

Applicant was required to exhaust its administrative remedies before seeking a declaratory order from the court for injunctive relief. Regional Care Facilities, Inc. v. Rose Care, Inc., 322 Ark. 780, 912 S.W.2d 406 (1995).

This section does not allow one to file a declaratory judgment action in court without first exhausting his administrative remedies before the Game and Fish Commission. Ford v. Ark. Game & Fish Comm'n, 335 Ark. 245, 979 S.W.2d 897 (1998).

Where the Arkansas Tobacco Control Board charged a company with violating the anti-rebating provisions of the Arkansas Unfair Cigarette Sales Act, §4-75-708(b), the company was required to exhaust its administrative remedies before seeking declaratory relief in the form of preliminary and permanent injunctions in the circuit court; moreover, company's constitutional argument could be raised and developed at the administrative level. McLane S., Inc. v. Davis, 80 Ark. App. 30, 90 S.W.3d 16 (2002).

Appellants were not required to exhaust administrative remedies before they filed a lawsuit to challenge the constitutionality of § 200.3.2 of the Minimum Licensing Standards for Child Welfare Agencies because appellants, who would all be prohibited under the regulation from becoming foster parents because there were adult homosexuals in their homes, had shown that the threat of injury to them would justify having the regulation reviewed. Dep't of Human Servs. v. Howard, 367 Ark. 55, 238 S.W.3d 1 (2006).

Circuit court properly dismissed a physician's complaint for declaratory judgment and injunctive relief against the Arkansas State Medical Board where the statutes and regulations he sought to challenge did not completely bar any class of physicians from a certain act, and he failed to pursue the administrative remedy afforded him.Ahmad v. Beck, 2016 Ark. 30, 480 S.W.3d 166 (2016).

When a rule (or declaratory order) has a direct effect on the day-to-day business operations of an insurance company and places that company in a dilemma regarding the full range of property and casualty insurance, the issue is a fit subject for judicial review and a petition for declaratory relief. Douglass v. Nationwide Mut. Ins. Co., 323 Ark. 105, 913 S.W.2d 277 (1996).

Subsection (b) of this section, discussing venue for declaratory judgment actions brought to challenge the validity or applicability of an administrative agency rule, by its express terms applied only to such actions brought in the trial court. Ark. Game & Fish Comm'n v. Harkey, 345 Ark. 279, 45 S.W.3d 829 (2001).

Cited: Statewide Health Coordinating Council v. Circuit Court, 287 Ark. 84, 696 S.W.2d 729 (1985); UHS of Ark., Inc. v. City of Sherwood, 296 Ark. 97, 752 S.W.2d 36 (1988); Ark. Game & Fish Comm'n v. Murders, 327 Ark. 426, 327 Ark. 426, 938 S.W.2d 854 (1997); Doe v. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs., 357 Ark. 413, 182 S.W.3d 107 (2004); Ark. Residential Assisted Living Ass'n v. Ark. Health Servs. Permit Comm'n, 364 Ark. 372, 220 S.W.3d 665 (2005); Quapaw Care & Rehab. v. Arkansas Health Servs. Permit Comm'n, 2009 Ark. 356, 325 S.W.3d 269 (2009).

All parties shall be afforded an opportunity for hearing after reasonable notice;

The notice shall include:

A statement of the time, place, and nature of the hearing;

A statement of the legal authority and jurisdiction under which the hearing is to be held; and

A short and plain statement of the matters of fact and law asserted;

In every case of adjudication wherein an agency seeks to revoke, suspend, or otherwise sanction a license or permit holder, the agency or its attorney, upon the request of the license or permit holder, must provide the following information prior to conducting a hearing of adjudication:

The names and addresses of persons whom the agency intends to call as witnesses at any hearing;

Any written or recorded statements and the substance of any oral statements made by the license or permit holder, or a copy of the same;

Any reports or statements of experts, made in connection with the particular case, including results of physical or mental examinations, scientific tests, experiments, or comparisons, or copies of the same;

Any books, papers, documents, photographs, or tangible objects which the agency intends to use in any hearing or which were obtained from or belong to the license or permit holder, or copies of the same;

Disclosure shall not be required of research or records, correspondence, reports, or memoranda to the extent that they contain the opinions, theories, or conclusions of the attorney for the agency or members of his or her staff or other state agents;

Opportunity shall be afforded all parties to respond and present evidence and argument on all issues involved;

The record shall include:

All pleadings, motions, and intermediate rulings;

Evidence received or considered, including, on request of any party, a transcript of oral proceedings or any part thereof;

A statement of matters officially noticed;

Offers of proof, objections, and rulings thereon;

Proposed findings and exceptions thereto; and

All staff memoranda or data submitted to the hearing officer or members of an agency in connection with their consideration of the case;

Findings of fact shall be based exclusively on the evidence and on matters officially noticed;

If the agency is authorized by law to issue subpoenas for the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of documents or things, then any party shall to the same extent be so authorized, and the agency shall issue a subpoena forthwith on written application thereof.

A subpoena may be served in the manner as now provided for by statute or rule for the service of subpoenas in civil cases or by any form of mail addressed to the person to be served with a return receipt requested and delivery restricted to the addressee or agent of the addressee.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment added the (a)(7)(A) designation and (a)(7)(B).

Ark. L. Notes.

Watkins, Using the Freedom of Information Act as a Discovery Device, 1994 Ark. L. Notes 59.

The discretionary authority for an adjudicatory or administrative hearing contained in former §23-32-1203(e) precludes the application of subdivision (a)(3) of this section by virtue of §25-15-211. Simply stated, in this situation the Administrative Procedure Act does not apply to the activities of the state bank commissioner. First Nat'l Bank v. Arkansas State Bank Comm'r, 301 Ark. 1, 781 S.W.2d 744 (1989).

Revocation of an insurance license was upheld because hearing notice sent by the Arkansas Insurance Department provided sufficient warnings of the allegations against a title insurance company owner; a detailed description of the precise instances of misconduct was not required. The notice plainly charged the owner with diverting or misappropriating escrow funds, and it reasonably informed the owner of the type of violations that were later cited in the Department's order as a basis for revocation.Dyer v. Ark. Ins. Dep't, 2015 Ark. App. 446, 468 S.W.3d 303 (2015).

In a case involving the revocation of an insurance license, even though challenged documents likely contained hearsay, the rules of evidence are relaxed in an administrative proceeding; moreover, the owner had the ability to subpoena witnesses to call the document preparers himself, or he could have asked for a continuance or a rehearing. Therefore, the administrative refusal to exclude the evidence outright was upheld.Dyer v. Ark. Ins. Dep't, 2015 Ark. App. 446, 468 S.W.3d 303 (2015).

Cited: Franklin v. Arkansas Dep't of Human Servs., 319 Ark. 468, 892 S.W.2d 262 (1995); Brown v. Ark. State Heating, Ventilation, Air Conditioning & Refrigeration Licensing Bd., 336 Ark. 34, 984 S.W.2d 402 (1999); Holloway v. State Bd. of Architects, 79 Ark. App. 200, 86 S.W.3d 391 (2002); Nash v. Ark. Elevator Safety Bd., 370 Ark. 345, 259 S.W.3d 421 (2007); Gilmore v. Ark. Bd. of Registration for Prof'l Eng'rs & Land Surveyors, 2011 Ark. App. 139, 381 S.W.3d 860 (2011).

Subsection (b) of this section expressly allows communications between agency members. Ark. Appraiser Licensing & Certification Bd. v. Fletcher, 326 Ark. 628, 933 S.W.2d 789 (1996).

Unsworn statements at public hearings and written communications read aloud into the record are not ex parte communications in violation of subsection (a). City of Benton v. Arkansas Soil & Water Conservation Comm'n, 345 Ark. 249, 45 S.W.3d 805 (2001).

Subsection (a) of this section does not prohibit business relationships between agency members; it prohibits communications about issues relating to a particular adjudication proceeding. Ark. Appraiser Licensing & Certification Bd. v. Fletcher, 326 Ark. 628, 933 S.W.2d 789 (1996).

Violations of subsection (a) must be established by proof of the existence and content of the alleged ex parte communications. Ark. Appraiser Licensing & Certification Bd. v. Fletcher, 326 Ark. 628, 933 S.W.2d 789 (1996).

Third party contacts made to Alcoholic Beverage Control Board members violated subsection (a) and, as procedural irregularities, were properly allowed by the trial court as additional testimony describing these contacts and were added to the record pursuant to §25-15-212. Arkansas Alcoholic Beverage Control Div. v. Cox, 306 Ark. 82, 811 S.W.2d 305, 1991 Ark. LEXIS 343 (1991).

Physician failed to sufficiently develop or elicit any proof to support her allegations that she was denied a fair hearing and due process with regard to the State Medical Board's counsel also acting as prosecutor in the disciplinary proceedings. The physician did not attend the hearing before the Board or retain counsel, and her pleadings contained only speculative and conclusory allegations.McCormick v. Ark. State Med. Bd., 2017 Ark. App. 697, 545 S.W.3d 776 (2017).

Cited: Madden v. United States Assocs., 40 Ark. App. 143, 844 S.W.2d 374 (1992).

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Derden, Survey of Arkansas Law: Administrative Law, 2 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 157.

Where administrative board's findings did not state how the chiropractor's ad violated the board's regulation against deceptive advertising, but merely recited conclusions regarding the alleged violations, the case had to be remanded for further findings of fact and conclusions of law. Nesterenko v. Arkansas Bd. of Chiropractic Exam'rs, 76 Ark. App. 561, 69 S.W.3d 459 (2002).

After an appeal of a sex offender adjudication was dismissed on the ground that it could not be concluded that appellant had received notice of the Arkansas Department of Correction Sex Offender Screening and Risk Assessment Committee's (SOSRA's) final decision, the court denied SOSRA's petition for rehearing because §12-12-922(b)(6)(A) and (7)(A) required SOSRA to send “findings” to appellant, which proscription was consistent with the requirements of the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act under subdivision (b)(2) of this section.Munson v. Ark. Dep't of Corr. Sex Offender Screening, 369 Ark. 290, 253 S.W.3d 901 (2007).

Although the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board failed to make findings of fact and conclusions of law as to the “sale” of liquor permits, appellants never requested or offered any proposed findings on this issue and merely raised the contention in closing.Ark. Bev. Retailers Ass'n v. Langley, 2011 Ark. App. 259 (2011).

Because the Arkansas Health Services Permit Commission did not set forth any findings of fact or conclusions of law to support its decision to grant the transfer of a permit of approval, in accordance with subdivision (b)(2) of this section, the matter had to be remanded.Twin Rivers Health & Rehab, LLC v. Ark. Health Servs. Permit Comm'n, 2012 Ark. 15 (2012).

Because the Arkansas Motor Vehicle Commission failed in its obligation to make sufficient findings of fact relevant to the contested issue of what constituted the current model year, the supreme court could not determine whether the Commission had resolved that issue in conformity with the law.Voltage Vehicles v. Arkansas Motor Vehicle Comm'n, 2012 Ark. 386, 424 S.W.3d 281 (2012).

Subsection (b) does not require findings of fact to be couched in statutory language; it only requires that if such findings of fact are set forth in statutory language they be accompanied with a statement of the underlying facts. Fowler v. Ark. Real Estate Comm'n, 258 Ark. 292, 524 S.W.2d 230 (1975).

The State Banking Board is not required to make specific rulings except in its final decision. Bank of Waldron v. Scott County Bank, 267 Ark. 407, 590 S.W.2d 654 (1979).

In granting a bank charter, the State Banking Board could adopt findings of fact and conclusions of law after deciding to grant the charter. Citizens Bank v. Arkansas State Banking Bd., 271 Ark. 703, 610 S.W.2d 257 (1981).

The case law strictly interpreting subdivision (b)(2) of this section would only be applicable to those cases where notice and a hearing are both required. In contrast, given the informal nature of the branch bank application procedure, the state bank commissioner's findings of fact are sufficient to satisfy the requirements of §23-32-1203(f). First Nat'l Bank v. Arkansas State Bank Comm'r, 301 Ark. 1, 781 S.W.2d 744 (1989).

Reviewing courts may not supply findings by weighing the evidence themselves, because that function is the responsibility of the administrative agency, which sees the witnesses as they testify. Green House, Inc. v. Ark. ABC Div., 29 Ark. App. 229, 780 S.W.2d 347 (1989).

Failure to allow response to proposed findings of fact or hearing with regard thereto and adoption of proposed findings was not arbitrary and capricious nor an abuse of discretion where opposing counsel was provided with copy of proposed findings and failed to submit any modifications or comments or any findings of its own. Bank of Waldron v. Scott County Bank, 267 Ark. 407, 590 S.W.2d 654 (1979).

Board's actions in 1993 were not tantamount to a reopening of the issue of fireman's retirement benefits granted in 1989; if fireman presented any information about, or evidence of, a work-related injury to the Board, it was not included in the record and the record did not contain any medical information provided by fireman to support a reopening nor any evidence of fraud, mistake, or misconception of facts that would have supported a reopening of the earlier claim, and thus Board did not fail to comply with this section because there was no adjudication on the merits. Earp v. Benton Fire Dep't, 52 Ark. App. 66, 914 S.W.2d 781 (1996).

Case remanded to board for failure to make findings. Floyd v. Ark. State Bd. of Pharmacy, 251 Ark. 626, 473 S.W.2d 866 (1971); Arkansas Sav. & Loan Ass’n Board v. Central Arkansas Sav. & Loan Ass’n, 256 Ark. 846, 510 S.W.2d 872, 1974 Ark. LEXIS 1550 (1974); Gordon v. Cummings, 262 Ark. 737, 561 S.W.2d 285 (1978).

The statutory requirement with respect to findings is primarily for the benefit of the reviewing courts and a failure to comply with this section is a minor and inconsequential matter. Independence Sav. & Loan Ass'n v. Citizens Fed. Sav. & Loan Ass'n, 265 Ark. 203, 577 S.W.2d 390 (1979).

Fireman's appeal from his termination from the city fire department was dismissed for want of jurisdiction as the civil service commission, in affirming the termination, made no written order nor any findings of fact or conclusions of law as required by §14-51-308(e)(1)(B)(ii); accordingly, the matter was reversed and remanded so that the trial court could dismiss the appeal without prejudice, allowing the fireman to refile his appeal with the circuit court after the commission entered a written order. Lawrence v. City of Texarkana, 364 Ark. 466, 221 S.W.3d 370 (2006).

Remand of a police officer's application for retirement benefits was required because the administrative board had not made appropriate findings of fact as required by subdivision (b)(2) of this section. While the board's order had the labels “findings of fact” and “conclusions of law,” it was merely a procedural history of the administrative process and contained no information stating the facts upon which the board made its decision.Spriggs v. Ark. Local Police & Fire Retirement Bd., 2010 Ark. App. 197 (2010).

Findings held to be insufficient to meet the requirements of this section. First State Bldg. & Loan Ass'n v. Arkansas Sav. & Loan Bd., 257 Ark. 599, 518 S.W.2d 507 (1975); First Fed. Sav. & Loan Ass'n v. Arkansas Sav. & Loan Ass'n Bd., 257 Ark. 985, 521 S.W.2d 542 (1975).

Findings held to be sufficient. Holifield v. Ark. ABC Bd., 273 Ark. 305, 619 S.W.2d 621 (1981).

Where Pest Control Committee made specific findings of fact and conclusions of law which the Plant Board adopted, the Board had complied with the requirements of this Act. Wright v. Ark. State Plant Bd., 311 Ark. 125, 842 S.W.2d 42 (1992).

The statistics, facts, and conclusions of law recited by the agency and the commission were adequate to facilitate judicial review and to serve the other considerations set out in prior case law. Olsten Health Servs., Inc. v. Arkansas Health Servs. Comm'n, 69 Ark. App. 313, 12 S.W.3d 656 (2000).

Alcoholic Beverage Control Board's findings and conclusions went beyond a mere recitation of evidence and were, thus, adequate to permit the appellate court to undertake a proper review of the board's ruling. Vallaroutto v. ABC Bd., 81 Ark. App. 318, 101 S.W.3d 836 (2003).

Arkansas Board of Architecture's findings that an engineer was acting in the capacity of an architect without the benefit of a license was supported by sufficient facts relevant to the contested issue so that an appellate court could determine whether the board had resolved those issues in conformity with the law. Holloway v. Ark. State Bd. of Architects, 352 Ark. 427, 101 S.W.3d 805 (2003).

Where the Arkansas State Board of Chiropractic Examiners' findings of fact that a physical therapist's treatment of two patients consisted of “popping” their spines included sufficient details of the witnesses's testimony upon which the Board reasonably relied in reaching its decision, those findings were sufficient under subsection (b) of this section. Teston v. Ark. State Bd. of Chiropractic Examiners, 361 Ark. 300, 206 S.W.3d 796, cert. denied, 546 U.S. 960, 126 S. Ct. 480, 163 L. Ed. 2d 363 (2005).

Trial court erred in affirming the Board's order suspending appraiser's license as the Board did not make the necessary findings of fact to support its order that the appraiser had violated certain appraisal standards, as required by subdivision (b)(2) of this section. Chandler v. Arkansas Appraisers Licensing & Certification Bd., 92 Ark. App. 423, 214 S.W.3d 861 (2005).

Case was sent back to the Arkansas State Board of Chiropractic Examiners because the Board's final order imposing a fine on the chiropractors and placing them on probation for committing eight “unprofessional conduct” violations was not specific enough given the many issues in play and the voluminous agency record.Ark. State Bd. of Chiropractic Examiners v. Currie, 2013 Ark. App. 612 (2013).

Case had to be remanded for the State Board of Licensure for Professional Engineers and Professional Surveyors to make specific findings of fact and conclusions of law because the findings and conclusions were insufficient to allow a reviewing court to determine whether several issues were resolved in conformity with the law; the Board made no comment regarding the truth or falsity of a landowner's assertions against a surveyor.Ark. State Bd. of Licensure for Prof'l Eng'rs & Prof'l Surveyors v. Callicott, 2016 Ark. App. 476, 503 S.W.3d 860 (2016).

Where an appraiser was sanctioned by the appraiser board for a deficient appraisal, although the findings did not explain precisely how the appraiser could have remedied the deficiencies in his appraisal, the law does not require this level of specificity; the findings explained the portion of the appraisal that the board deemed deficient, and by reviewing those findings, the court could determine whether the board conformed with the law.Reynolds v. Ark. Appraiser Licensing & Certification Bd., 2019 Ark. App. 587, 591 S.W.3d 837 (2019).

The requirements of this section as to findings are primarily for the benefit of the reviewing court and cannot be waived by the parties. Arkansas Sav. & Loan Ass’n Board v. Central Arkansas Sav. & Loan Ass’n, 256 Ark. 846, 510 S.W.2d 872, 1974 Ark. LEXIS 1550 (1974); First State Bldg. & Loan Ass'n v. Arkansas Sav. & Loan Bd., 257 Ark. 599, 518 S.W.2d 507 (1975); Gordon v. Cummings, 262 Ark. 737, 561 S.W.2d 285 (1978).

Service of an order of an administrative agency can be by mail; there is no requirement that such service comply with the law regarding service of summons. Ark. Contractors Licensing Bd. v. F & F Concrete Prods., Inc., 297 Ark. 508, 763 S.W.2d 86 (1989).

Cited: Floyd v. Ark. State Bd. of Pharmacy, 248 Ark. 459, 451 S.W.2d 874 (1970); Sikes v. General Publishing Co., 264 Ark. 1, 568 S.W.2d 33 (1978); Jones v. Reed, 267 Ark. 237, 590 S.W.2d 6 (1979); Fouch v. State, Alcoholic Beverage Control Div., 10 Ark. App. 139, 662 S.W.2d 181, 1983 Ark. App. LEXIS 935 (1983); Brown v. Ark. State Heating, Ventilation, Air Conditioning & Refrigeration Licensing Bd., 336 Ark. 34, 984 S.W.2d 402 (1999).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (d)(1) and twice in (d)(2); and substituted “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” in (d)(2).

The discretionary authority for an adjudicatory or administrative hearing contained in former §23-32-1203(e) precludes the application of §25-15-208(a)(3) by virtue of this section. The Administrative Procedure Act does not apply to the activities of the state bank commissioner. First Nat'l Bank v. Arkansas State Bank Comm'r, 301 Ark. 1, 781 S.W.2d 744 (1989).

Decision of state highway commission to cancel permits and cut down outdoor advertising signs could only be carried out after an adjudication requiring a notice and hearing since order deprived the sign owner of his property without due process. Ark. State Hwy. Comm'n v. White Adv. Int'l, 273 Ark. 364, 620 S.W.2d 280 (1981).

Medical board had authority to temporarily restrict physician's prescribing practices as a condition to granting continuance of hearing on malpractice charges. Ark. State Medical Bd. v. Leonard, 267 Ark. 61, 590 S.W.2d 849 (1979).

Revocation of an insurance license was upheld because hearing notice sent by the Arkansas Insurance Department provided sufficient warnings of the allegations against a title insurance company owner; a detailed description of the precise instances of misconduct was not required. The notice plainly charged the owner with diverting or misappropriating escrow funds, and it reasonably informed the owner of the type of violations that were later cited in the Department's order as a basis for revocation.Dyer v. Ark. Ins. Dep't, 2015 Ark. App. 446, 468 S.W.3d 303 (2015).

Cited: Fowler v. Ark. Real Estate Comm'n, 258 Ark. 292, 524 S.W.2d 230 (1975); Brown v. Ark. State Heating, Ventilation, Air Conditioning & Refrigeration Licensing Bd., 336 Ark. 34, 984 S.W.2d 402 (1999).

Nothing in this subchapter shall prohibit informal disposition by stipulation, settlement, consent order, or default.

Unless required for the disposition of ex parte matters authorized by law, members or employees of an agency assigned to render a decision or to make final or proposed findings of fact or conclusions of law in any case of adjudication shall not communicate, directly or indirectly, in connection with any issue of fact with any person or party nor, in connection with any issue of law, with any party or his or her representative, except upon notice and opportunity for all parties to participate.

An agency member may:

When, in a case of adjudication, a majority of the officials of the agency who are to render the decision have not heard the case or read the record, the decision, if adverse to a party other than the agency, shall not be made until a proposal for decision is served upon the parties and an opportunity is afforded to each party adversely affected to file exceptions and present briefs and oral argument to the officials who are to render the decision. The proposal for decision shall contain a statement of the reasons therefor and of each issue of fact or law necessary thereto, prepared by the person who conducted the hearing.

(1)In every case of adjudication, a final decision or order shall be in writing or stated in the record.

Parties shall be served either personally or by mail with a copy of any decision or order.

When the grant, denial, or renewal of a license is required by law to be preceded by notice and an opportunity for hearing, the provisions of this subchapter concerning cases of adjudication apply.

When a licensee has made timely and sufficient application for the renewal of a license or a new license with reference to any activity of a continuing nature, the existing license shall not expire until the application has been finally determined by the agency and, in case the application is denied or the terms of the new license limited, until the last day for seeking review of the agency order, or a later date fixed by order of the reviewing court.

No revocation, suspension, annulment, or withdrawal of any license is lawful unless the agency gives notice by mail to the licensee of facts or conduct warranting the intended action and unless the licensee is given an opportunity to show compliance with all lawful requirements for the retention of the license. If the agency finds that public health, safety, or welfare imperatively requires emergency action and incorporates a finding to that effect in its order, summary suspension of a license may be ordered pending proceedings for revocation or other action, which proceedings shall be promptly instituted and determined.

(1)A complaint filed by an offender with a state licensing board or state licensing agency against a licensee of the board or agency shall not be heard by the board or agency unless the complaint is accompanied by appropriately verified documentation showing that the offender has exhausted all administrative remedies under the Division of Correction grievance procedure.

In cases of adjudication, any person, except an inmate under sentence to the custody of the Division of Correction, who considers himself or herself injured in his or her person, business, or property by final agency action shall be entitled to judicial review of the action under this subchapter. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit other means of review provided by law.

(1)Proceedings for review shall be instituted by filing a petition within thirty (30) days after service upon petitioner of the agency's final decision in:

The circuit court of any county in which the petitioner resides or does business; or

Pulaski County Circuit Court.

In its discretion, the court may permit other interested persons to intervene.

Copies of the petition shall be served upon the agency and all other parties of record in accordance with the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure.

The filing of the petition does not automatically stay enforcement of the agency decision, but the agency or reviewing court may do so upon such terms as may be just. However, on review of disciplinary orders issued by professional licensing boards governing professions of the healing arts, the reviewing court, only after notice and hearing, may issue all necessary and appropriate process to postpone the effective date of an agency action or to preserve status or rights pending conclusion of review proceedings.

(1)Within thirty (30) days after service of the petition or within such further time as the court may allow but not exceeding an aggregate of ninety (90) days, the agency shall transmit to the reviewing court the original or a certified copy of the entire record of the proceeding under review.

If review proceedings have been instituted in two (2) or more circuit courts with respect to the same order, the agency concerned shall file the record in the court in which a proceeding was first instituted. The other courts in which the proceedings are pending shall thereupon transfer them to the court in which the record has been filed.

If before the date set for hearing, application is made to the court for leave to present additional evidence and the court finds that the evidence is material and that there were good reasons for failure to present it in the proceeding before the agency, the court may order that the additional evidence be taken before the agency upon any conditions which may be just. The agency may modify its findings and decision by reason of the additional evidence and shall file that evidence and any modifications, new findings, or decisions with the reviewing court.

The review shall be conducted by the court without a jury and shall be confined to the record, except that in cases of alleged irregularities in procedure before the agency not shown in the record, testimony may be taken before the court. The court shall, upon request, hear oral argument and receive written briefs.

The court may affirm the decision of the agency or remand the case for further proceedings. It may reverse or modify the decision if the substantial rights of the petitioner have been prejudiced because the administrative findings, inferences, conclusions, or decisions are:

In violation of constitutional or statutory provisions;

In excess of the agency's statutory authority;

Made upon unlawful procedure;

Affected by other error or law;

Not supported by substantial evidence of record; or

Arbitrary, capricious, or characterized by abuse of discretion.

Any agency order which is affirmed or affirmed in part by the court shall be a final judgment subject to writ of garnishment or execution to the extent it is affirmed.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1989, No. 709, was held unconstitutional in Clinton v. Bonds, 306 Ark. 554, 816 S.W.2d 169 (1991).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (a).

Ark. L. Notes.

Looney, Handling Administrative Proceedings Before the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Department and Commission, 1988 Ark. L. Notes 23.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Derden, Survey of Arkansas Law: Administrative Law, 2 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 157.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Annual Survey of Case Law: Practice, Procedure, and Courts, 29 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 905.

Acts 1989, No. 709, which amended subsection (a) of this section, unconstitutionally deprives inmates of review of constitutional questions, because judicial review of all other administrative questions may be granted, or withheld, according to the legislature's discretion. Clinton v. Bonds, 306 Ark. 554, 816 S.W.2d 169 (1991).

The procedure for judicial review under this subchapter is an exception to the rules of civil procedure. Whitlock v. G.P.W. Nursing Home, Inc., 283 Ark. 158, 672 S.W.2d 48 (1984).

This subchapter provides an alternate appellate procedure and jurisdiction for the judicial review of an adjudication by an agency subject to this subchapter. United States Rooter All Type Plumbing Co. v. Holliman, 50 Ark. App. 125, 900 S.W.2d 580 (1995).

Under this chapter, it is not the role of the circuit courts or the appellate courts to conduct a de novo review of the record, but to review the case to ascertain whether there is substantial evidence to support the agency decision or whether the agency decision runs afoul of one of the other criteria set out in subsection (h). Arkansas Dep't of Human Servs. v. Thompson, 331 Ark. 181, 959 S.W.2d 46 (1998).

Because there had been no adjudication before the administrative agency, there was no final agency action to be reviewed pursuant to this section and the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et seq., did not apply. Ark. Dep't of Econ. Dev. v. William J. Clinton Presidential Found., 364 Ark. 40, 216 S.W.3d 119 (2005).

Under the flexible Mathews factors, the procedural avenues afforded by the Sex Offender Registration Act, §12-12-901 et seq., were constitutionally adequate and provided notice to offenders of the risk assessment process and a meaningful opportunity to be heard; the Registration Act provides for an adversarial judicial review of the Committee's administrative review decision, with the full procedural guarantees set forth in the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, and it was unlikely that a right to counsel or to confront witnesses at the initial assessment stage would have appreciably reduced the risk of an erroneous determination.Weems v. Little Rock Police Dep't, 453 F.3d 1010 (8th Cir. 2006), cert. denied, 550 U.S. 917, 127 S. Ct. 2128, 167 L. Ed. 2d 862 (2007).

Judicial review of Arkansas Cemetery Board order was within the scope of a proceeding to review an action covered by this subchapter. Arkansas Cem. Bd. v. Memorial Properties, Inc., 272 Ark. 172, 616 S.W.2d 713 (1981).

It is only in the judicial functions that this subchapter purports to subject agency decisions to appellate review and then only as narrowly prescribed in the subchapter. Arkansas Livestock & Poultry Comm'n v. House, 276 Ark. 326, 634 S.W.2d 388 (1982).

Termination of an agency employee is not a judicial function, but an administrative act which is not subject to judicial review and agency did not subject itself to judicial review by giving employee the right to be heard and proceeding in a quasi-judicial fashion. Arkansas Livestock & Poultry Comm'n v. House, 276 Ark. 326, 634 S.W.2d 388 (1982).

The Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act is not closely analogous to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act and, therefore, the 30 day limitations period contained in subsection (b)(1) does not apply to the latter act. Birmingham v. Omaha Sch. Dist., 220 F.3d 850 (8th Cir. 2000).
